Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 12. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Lis Pendens, § 1 et seq.

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parties, §§ 4-20, 112-119.

54 C.J.S., Lis Pendens, § 1 et seq.

67A C.J.S., Parties, §§ 173-181.

Sec. 09.45.900.
Joining unknown heirs as defendants in real property suits.

When the heirs of a deceased person are proper parties defendant to an action relating to real property in this state, and when the names and residences of the heirs are unknown, the heirs may be proceeded against under the name and title of “the unknown heirs” of the deceased.

History.

(§ 30.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.45.750

. Renumbered in 1994.

Collateral references. —

Notice by judicial proceedings of adverse possession between cotenants, 82 ALR2d 265.

Sec. 09.45.910.
Service on unknown heirs by publication.

Upon presenting an affidavit to the court or judge showing to the satisfaction of the court or judge that the heirs of the deceased person are proper parties to the action and that their names and residences cannot with the use of reasonable diligence be ascertained, the court or judge may grant an order that service of the summons in the action may be made on the “unknown heirs” by publication of the summons in the same manner as in actions against nonresident defendants.

History.

(§ 30.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.760. Renumbered in 1994.

Sec. 09.45.920.
Unknown claimants in real property suits.

In any action brought to determine an adverse claim, estate, lien, or interest in real property or to quiet title to real property, the plaintiff may include as a defendant in the action and insert in the title of the action, in addition to the names of the persons or parties that appear of record to have, and other persons or parties who are known to have some title, claim, estate, lien, or interest in the lands in controversy, the following: “Also all other persons or parties unknown claiming a right, title, estate, lien, or interest in the real estate described in the complaint in this action.”
Service of summons may be had upon all unknown persons or parties defendant by publication as provided by law in cases of nonresident defendants.

History.

(§ 30.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.770. Renumbered in 1994.

Sec. 09.45.930.
Rights of unknown heirs and parties served by publication.

All the unknown heirs of deceased persons and all the unknown persons or parties served by publication as provided in AS

09.45.920

have the same rights as are provided by law in the case of all other defendants upon whom service is made by publication, and the action shall proceed against the unknown heirs or unknown persons or parties in the same manner as against defendants who are named and upon whom service is made by publication, and with the same effect.
The unknown heirs or unknown persons or parties who have or claim an interest, right, estate, or lien in the said real property in controversy at the time of the commencement of the action and who are served as aforesaid shall be bound and concluded by the judgment or decree in the action as effectually as if the action was brought against the defendant by name and constructive service of summons obtained.

History.

(§ 30.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.780. Renumbered in 1994, at which time “AS

09.45.920

” was substituted for “AS 09.45.770” to reflect the 1994 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 09.45.940.
Lis pendens.

In an action affecting the title to or the right of possession of real property, the plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint, or afterwards, and the defendant, when affirmative relief is claimed, at the time of filing the answer, or afterwards, may record in the office of the recorder of the recording district in which the property is situated a notice of the pendency of the action, containing the names of the parties, and the object of the action or defense, and a description of the property affected in that district. From the time of recording the notice, a purchaser, holder of a contract or option to purchase, or encumbrancer of the property affected has constructive notice of the pendency of the action and of its pendency against parties designated by their real names.

History.

(§ 5.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.45.790. Renumbered in 1994. Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Opinions of attorney general. —

“Common law liens at law” and “claims of common law” which are filed in connection with lawsuits unrelated to the title or right to possession of real property are not legally effective for any purpose whatsoever. Such documents may not legally be recorded and the recorder should not record these documents. Since common law liens which were mistakenly recorded by the recorder’s office were unauthorized documents which should not have been recorded, their recording does not give constructive notice of their contents to anyone and the recordation of those unauthorized documents is void and of no legal effect. March 24, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.